Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1701
Act, how cited.

Sections 14-1701 to 14-1725 shall be known and may be cited as the Parking Authority Law.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 1, p. 101.

Parking Authority Law sustained as constitutional. Omaha Parking Authority v. City of Omaha, 163 Neb. 97, 77 N.W.2d 862 (1956).